Hawaii statutes.
[§134-23] Place to keep loaded firearms
other than pistols and revolvers; penalty. (a) Except as provided in
section 134-5, all firearms shall be confined to the possessor's place of
business, residence, or sojourn; provided that it shall be lawful to carry
unloaded firearms in an enclosed container from the place of purchase to the
purchaser's place of business, residence, or sojourn, or between these places
upon change of place of business, residence, or sojourn, or between these
places and the following:

(1) A place of repair;

(2) A target range;

(3) A licensed dealer's place of business;

(4) An organized, scheduled firearms show or exhibit;

(5) A place of formal hunter or firearm use training
or instruction; or

(6) A police station.

"Enclosed container" means a rigidly
constructed receptacle, or a commercially manufactured gun case, or the
equivalent thereof that completely encloses the firearm.

(b) Any person violating this section by
carrying or possessing a loaded firearm other than a pistol or revolver shall
be guilty of a class B felony. [L 2006, c 66, pt of §1]

Case Notes

Discussed: 911 F. Supp. 2d 972 (2012).

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next